Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4047
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-4047 to 44-4067 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurance Producers Licensing Act.

Laws 1984, LB 801, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 419, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 93;

Laws 1999, LB 424, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 44-4001;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 1.